Washington statutes.
RCW 35.94.050

Application of chapter to certain service provider agreements under chapter 70A.140 RCW.

This chapter does not apply to dispositions of utility property in connection with an agreement entered into pursuant to chapter 70A.140 RCW provided there is compliance with the procurement procedure under RCW 70A.140.040.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1015; 1986 c 244 s 11.]